Maryland, session 2026, SB0909.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
14–4701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(w) (1) “Personal data” means any information that is linked or can be
reasonably linked to an identified or identifiable consumer.
(2) “Personal data” does not include:
(i) De–identified data; or
(ii) Publicly available information.
14–4702.
This subtitle applies to a person that [conducts]:
(1) CONDUCTS business in the State or provides products or services that
are targeted to residents of the State, and that during the preceding calendar year did any
of the following:
[(1)] (I) Controlled or processed the personal data of at least 35,000
consumers, excluding personal data controlled or processed solely for the purpose of
completing a payment transaction; or
[(2)] (II) Controlled or processed the personal data of at least 10,000
consumers and derived more than 20% of its gross revenue from the sale of personal data;
OR
(2) COLLECTS PERSONAL DATA THROUGH THE USE OR OPERATION
OF A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE, AS DEFINED UNDER § 21–1501 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
Article – Transportation

SENATE BILL 909 3
15–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Operational design domain” means operating conditions under which a given
automated driving system is specifically designed to function, including conditions subject
to:
(1) Environmental restrictions;
(2) Geographic restrictions;
(3) Time–of–day restrictions; or
(4) The [required] REQUISITE presence or absence of certain traffic or
roadway characteristics.
SUBTITLE 15. FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES.
21–1501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM” MEANS THE HARDWARE AND
SOFTWARE THAT ARE COLLECTIVELY CAPABLE OF PERFORMING THE ENTIRE
DYNAMIC DRIVING TASK ON A SUSTAINED BASIS, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER IT IS
LIMITED TO A SPECIFIC OPERATIONAL DESIGN DOMAIN.
(C) “DYNAMIC DRIVING TASK” MEANS ALL OF THE REAL–TIME
OPERATIONAL FUNCTIONS REQUIRED TO OPERATE A MOTOR VEHICLE ON A
HIGHWAY, INCLUDING:
(1) LATERAL VEHICLE MOTION CONTROL THROUGH STEERING;
(2) LONGITUDINAL MOTION CONTROL THROUGH ACCELERATION
AND DECELERATION;
(3) MONITORING THE DRIVING ENVIRONMENT THROUGH OBJECT
AND EVENT DETECTION, RECOGNITION, CLASSIFICATION, AND RESPONSE
PREPARATION;
(4) OBJECT AND EVENT RESPONSE EXECUTION;

SENATE BILL 909
(5) MANEUVER PLANNING; AND
(6) SIGNALING WITH LIGHTS OR GESTURES.
(D) (1) “FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE” MEANS A MOTOR VEHICLE
EQUIPPED WITH AN AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM DESIGNED TO FUNCTION
WITHOUT A HUMAN DRIVER.
(2) “FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE” INCLUDES A MOTOR VEHICLE
EQUIPPED WITH A LEVEL 4 OR 5 SYSTEM AS DEFINED BY “TAXONOMY AND
DEFINITIONS FOR TERMS RELATED TO DRIVING AUTOMATION SYSTEMS FOR
ON–ROAD MOTOR VEHICLES” PUBLISHED BY THE SOCIETY OF AUTOMOTIVE
ENGINEERS INTERNATIONAL IN APRIL 2021.
(E) “HUMAN DRIVER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL IN A VEHICLE WITH A VALID
LICENSE TO OPERATE A MOTOR VEHICLE WHO IS ABLE TO PERFORM THE DYNAMIC
DRIVING TASK.
(F) “MINIMAL RISK CONDITION” MEANS A STABLE, STOPPED CONDITION TO
WHICH A HUMAN DRIVER OR AN AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM MAY BRING A FULLY
AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE AFTER PERFORMING THE DYNAMIC DRIVING TASK
FALLBACK TO REDUCE THE RISK OF A CRASH WHEN A GIVEN TRIP CANNOT OR
SHOULD NOT BE CONTINUED.
(G) “OPERATIONAL DESIGN DOMAIN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
15–901 OF THIS ARTICLE.
21–1502.
(A) A PERSON MAY OPERATE A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE ON A
HIGHWAY IN THE STATE WITHOUT A HUMAN DRIVER AND WITH THE AUTOMATED
DRIVING SYSTEM ENGAGED IF THE VEHICLE MEETS THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS:
(1) IF A FAILURE OF THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM OCCURS
THAT RENDERS THE SYSTEM UNABLE TO PERFORM THE ENTIRE DYNAMIC DRIVING
TASK RELEVANT TO ITS INTENDED OPERATIONAL DESIGN DOMAIN, THE FULLY
AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE WILL ACHIEVE A MINIMAL RISK CONDITION;
(2) THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE IS CAPABLE OF OPERATING IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW, UNLESS THE ADMINISTRATION
HAS ADOPTED A REGULATION EXEMPTING AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES FROM SPECIFIC
PROVISIONS OF LAW; AND

SENATE BILL 909 5
(3) THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE DISPLAYS THE REQUIRED
MANUFACTURER’S CERTIFICATION LABEL INDICATING THAT THE VEHICLE IS IN
COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE FEDERAL MOTOR VEHICLE SAFETY
STANDARDS, INCLUDING REFERENCE TO ANY EXEMPTION GRANTED BY THE
NATIONAL HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION.
(B) (1) BEFORE OPERATING A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE ON A
HIGHWAY IN THE STATE WITHOUT A HUMAN DRIVER AND WITH THE AUTOMATED
DRIVING SYSTEM ENGAGED, A PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR OPERATING THE VEHICLE
OR THE MANUFACTURER OF EITHER THE VEHICLE OR THE VEHICLE’S AUTOMATED
DRIVING SYSTEM SHALL SUBMIT A FIRST RESPONDER INTERACTION PLAN TO THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(2) A FIRST RESPONDER INTERACTION PLAN SHALL CONTAIN
INFORMATION ON:
(I) HOW TO COMMUNICATE WITH A FLEET SUPPORT
SPECIALIST WHO IS AVAILABLE DURING THE TIMES THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS
VEHICLE IS IN OPERATION;
(II) HOW TO SAFELY REMOVE THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS
VEHICLE FROM THE HIGHWAY AND STEPS TO PROPERLY TOW THE VEHICLE;
(III) HOW TO RECOGNIZE WHETHER THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS
VEHICLE IS OPERATING AUTONOMOUSLY; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE MANUFACTURER,
OWNER, OR ADMINISTRATION CONSIDERS NECESSARY, INCLUDING INFORMATION
REGARDING HAZARDOUS CONDITIONS OR PUBLIC SAFETY RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH
THE OPERATION OF A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE.
(C) A PERSON SHALL SUBMIT EVIDENCE TO THE ADMINISTRATION, IN THE
MANNER REQUIRED BY THE ADMINISTRATION, CERTIFYING THAT ALL SECURITY
REQUIRED UNDER § 21–1509 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS IN EFFECT BEFORE OPERATING
A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE WITHOUT A HUMAN DRIVER.
(D) WHEN A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE IS OPERATING WITH THE
AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM ENGAGED, THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM IS
CONSIDERED TO:
(1) BE THE VEHICLE OPERATOR FOR DETERMINING COMPLIANCE
WITH THE MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW;

SENATE BILL 909
(2) SATISFY ELECTRONICALLY ALL PHYSICAL ACTS REQUIRED BY A
VEHICLE DRIVER; AND
(3) BE LICENSED TO OPERATE THE VEHICLE.
(E) A HUMAN DRIVER MAY OPERATE A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE THAT
IS DESIGNED TO ALLOW HUMAN OPERATION IF THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM IS
NOT ENGAGED.
(F) (1) IN THE EVENT OF A VEHICLE CRASH INVOLVING A FULLY
AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE, THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE OR THE PERSON
OPERATING THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE SHALL COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS UNDER TITLE 20 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) ALL NOTICE AND REPORTING REQUIREMENTS UNDER TITLE 20
OF THIS ARTICLE SHALL BE SATISFIED WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER A VEHICLE CRASH
INVOLVING A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE, UNLESS AN EXTENSION IS GRANTED
UNDER TITLE 20 OF THIS ARTICLE.
21–1503.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION, A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY, FOR–HIRE VEHICLE COMPANY, OR OTHER
GROUND PASSENGER TRANSPORTATION COMPANY MAY USE FULLY AUTONOMOUS
VEHICLES.
(B) (1) ANY PROVISION OF THE MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW THAT BY ITS
NATURE APPLIES ONLY TO A HUMAN DRIVER DOES NOT APPLY TO THE OPERATOR
OF A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE WITH THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM
ENGAGED WHILE BEING USED BY A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY,
FOR–HIRE VEHICLE COMPANY, OR OTHER GROUND PASSENGER TRANSPORTATION
COMPANY.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE INTERPRETED
TO EXEMPT THE PERSON WHO IS ENGAGING THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM FOR
USE BY A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY, A FOR–HIRE VEHICLE COMPANY,
OR ANOTHER GROUND PASSENGER TRANSPORTATION COMPANY FROM ANY
REQUIREMENT OF § 21–1502 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) ALL FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES SHALL BE EQUIPPED WITH AN
ACCESSIBLE USER INTERFACE SUCH THAT INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES ARE
ABLE TO INDEPENDENTLY ACCESS ALL ASPECTS AND USER FEATURES OF THE
INTERFACE.

SENATE BILL 909 7
21–1504.
THE MOTOR VEHICLE TITLE AND REGISTRATION FOR A FULLY AUTONOMOUS
VEHICLE SHALL IDENTIFY THE VEHICLE AS A “FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE”.
21–1505.
A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE THAT IS DESIGNED TO BE OPERATED
EXCLUSIVELY BY THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM FOR ALL TRIPS IS NOT SUBJECT
TO STATE MOTOR VEHICLE EQUIPMENT LAWS THAT:
(1) RELATE TO OR SUPPORT MOTOR VEHICLE OPERATION BY A
HUMAN DRIVER SEATED IN THE VEHICLE; OR
(2) ARE NOT RELEVANT FOR AN AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM.
21–1506.
A STATE AGENCY OR LOCAL POLITICAL SUBDIVISION MAY NOT PROHIBIT THE
OPERATION OF FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES ON HIGHWAYS UNDER THE
JURISDICTION OF THE STATE AGENCY OR LOCAL POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OR
OTHERWISE ENACT OR KEEP IN EFFECT RULES OR ORDINANCES THAT WOULD
IMPOSE TAXES, FEES, OR OTHER REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIC TO THE OPERATION OF
FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES.
21–1507.
PERSONAL DATA, AS DEFINED IN § 14–4701 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW
ARTICLE, THAT IS COLLECTED BY AN AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO TITLE
14, SUBTITLE 47 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
21–1508.
(A) IF THE ADMINISTRATION HAS INFORMATION, DATA, OR OTHER
EVIDENCE INDICATING THAT AN AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE IS NOT IN SAFE
MECHANICAL CONDITION AND MAY ENDANGER PERSONS ON THE HIGHWAY, THE
ADMINISTRATION MAY ISSUE A REQUEST FOR RELEVANT INFORMATION TO THE
PERSON WHO SUBMITTED THE FIRST RESPONDER INTERACTION PLAN REQUIRED BY
§ 21–1502(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE OR THE PERSON’S SUCCESSOR.
(B) (1) THE PERSON WHO SUBMITTED THE FIRST RESPONDER
INTERACTION PLAN SHALL RESPOND TO A REQUEST FOR INFORMATION SUBMITTED

SENATE BILL 909
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME SPECIFIED
BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(2) THE RESPONSE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY BE IN THE FORM OF DOCUMENTS, A MEETING WITH THE
ADMINISTRATION, A DEMONSTRATION, OR ANY OTHER REASONABLE FORM OF
COMMUNICATION.
(C) (1) AFTER CONSIDERING AND EVALUATING ALL RESPONSES
PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE ADMINISTRATION
DETERMINES THAT AN AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE IS NOT IN SAFE MECHANICAL
CONDITION AND MAY ENDANGER PERSONS ON THE HIGHWAY, THE ADMINISTRATION
MAY SEND A NOTICE OF INTENT TO SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OR IMPOSE
RESTRICTIONS ON THE OPERATION OF THE AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE TO THE PERSON
WHO SUBMITTED THE FIRST RESPONDER INTERACTION PLAN OR THE PERSON’S
SUCCESSOR.
(2) THE NOTICE SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE ADMINISTRATION’S REASONS FOR
SUSPENDING THE REGISTRATION OR RESTRICTING OPERATION OF THE
AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE AND EVIDENCE SUPPORTING THE DETERMINATION; AND
(II) A STATEMENT REQUIRING THAT A CERTIFICATION OF
CORRECTION OR ADJUSTMENT BE SUBMITTED WITHIN A SPECIFIED TIME AND THAT
THE CERTIFICATION INCLUDE AN EXPLANATION OF HOW THE ISSUES IDENTIFIED BY
THE ADMINISTRATION IN THE NOTICE HAVE BEEN ADDRESSED.
(D) (1) IF THE PERSON WHO SUBMITTED THE FIRST RESPONDER
INTERACTION PLAN FOR THE AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF A
NOTICE OF INTENT TO SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OR RESTRICT OPERATION OR
THE PERSON’S SUCCESSOR FAILS TO SUBMIT THE CERTIFICATION OF CORRECTION
OR ADJUSTMENT WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED, OR THE ADMINISTRATION FINDS
THAT THE CERTIFICATION OF CORRECTION OR ADJUSTMENT IS INSUFFICIENT, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL NOTIFY THE PERSON THAT THE REGISTRATION FOR THAT
AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE HAS BEEN SUSPENDED OR THE OPERATIONS OF THE
AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE HAVE BEEN RESTRICTED.
(2) IF THE PERSON LATER SUBMITS THE REQUIRED CERTIFICATION,
THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL REMOVE THE SUSPENSION OR RESTRICTION ON
RECEIPT OF THE CERTIFICATION.
(E) (1) A PERSON MAY REQUEST A HEARING TO DISPUTE THE

SENATE BILL 909 9
ADMINISTRATION’S FINDING TO SUSPEND THE VEHICLE REGISTRATION OR
RESTRICT OPERATION WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF ISSUANCE OF THE
NOTICE OF INTENT REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A HEARING REQUESTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
HELD WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE SUBMISSION OF A HEARING REQUEST.
(3) A DECISION TO UPHOLD THE DETERMINATION OF THE
ADMINISTRATION IS SUBJECT TO APPEAL TO THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR THE COUNTY
IN WHICH THE PERSON WHO REQUESTED THE HEARING RESIDES.
21–1509.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION, A FULLY
AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE SHALL MAINTAIN:
(1) PROOF OF FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY IN THE SAME FORM AND
AT THE SAME MINIMUM LIMITS AS REQUIRED BY TITLE 17 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) PERSONAL INJURY PROTECTION BENEFITS AS REQUIRED BY §
19–505 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE; AND
(3) UNINSURED MOTORIST BENEFITS AS REQUIRED BY § 19–509 OF
THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
(B) (1) A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE WITH ITS AUTOMATED DRIVING
SYSTEM ENGAGED SHALL MAINTAIN PROOF OF FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY IN AN
AMOUNT NOT LESS THAN $1,000,000 COMBINED SINGLE LIMIT PER OCCURRENCE
FOR THIRD–PARTY LIABILITY.
(2) MAKERS OF INSURANCE POLICIES AND SELF–INSURANCE
PROGRAMS MAY CONTRACT AND COORDINATE WITH EACH OTHER TO DETERMINE
WHICH WILL SATISFY PERSONAL INJURY PROTECTION AND UNINSURED MOTORIST
BENEFIT REQUIREMENTS.
(C) FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
MAY BE SATISFIED BY HOLDING:
(1) AN INSURANCE POLICY ISSUED BY AN INSURER LICENSED IN THE
STATE; OR
(2) A SURPLUS LINES POLICY ISSUED BY AN ELIGIBLE
NONADMITTED INSURER AUTHORIZED UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE

SENATE BILL 909
INSURANCE ARTICLE.
(D) NO HIGHER LIMITS OF INSURANCE OR ADDITIONAL COVERAGES SHALL
BE REQUIRED SOLELY DUE TO AN AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE’S USE OF AN AUTOMATED
DRIVING SYSTEM.
21–1510.
THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL REVOKE A PERSON’S LICENSE TO SELL
VEHICLES DIRECTLY TO CONSUMERS UNDER § 15–305 OF THIS ARTICLE IF THE
PERSON COMMITS A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.